Florida, session 2026, SB1324.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (54) of section 605.0102, Florida 23 Statutes, is amended to read: 24 605.0102âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 25 (54)ââPrincipal officeâ means: 26 (a)âThe principal executive office of a limited liability 27 company or foreign limited liability company, regardless of 28 whether the office is located in this state; or 29 (b)âThe registered address of the registered agent filed 30 with the department pursuant to s. 605.0113(2). 31 Section 2.âSubsection (57) of section 607.01401, Florida 32 Statutes, is amended to read: 33 607.01401âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, unless the 34 context otherwise requires, the term: 35 (57)ââPrincipal officeâ means: 36 (a)âThe office, whether inside (in or outside out of this 37 state,) where the principal executive offices of a domestic or 38 foreign corporation are located as designated in the articles of 39 incorporation or other initial filing until an annual report has 40 been filed, and thereafter as designated in the annual report; 41 or 42 (b)âThe registered officeâs address filed with the 43 department pursuant to s. 607.0501(3). 44 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 605.0113, Florida 45 Statutes, is amended to read: 46 605.0113âRegistered agent.â 47 (2)âEach initial registered agent, and each successor 48 registered agent that is appointed, shall file a statement in 49 writing with the department, in the form and manner prescribed 50 by the department, accepting the appointment as registered agent 51 while simultaneously being designated as the registered agent. 52 The statement of acceptance must provide the address of the 53 registered office and that the registered agent is familiar with 54 and accepts the obligations of that position. 55 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 607.0501, Florida 56 Statutes, is amended to read: 57 607.0501âRegistered office and registered agent.â 58 (3)âEach initial registered agent, and each successor 59 registered agent that is appointed, shall file a statement in 60 writing with the department, in the form and manner prescribed 61 by the department, accepting the appointment as registered agent 62 while simultaneously being designated as the registered agent. 63 The statement of acceptance must provide the address of the 64 registered office and that the registered agent is familiar 65 with, and accepts, the obligations of that position. 66 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 67 made by this act to section 605.0113, Florida Statutes, in a 68 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 605.0114, Florida 69 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 70 605.0114âChange of registered agent or registered office.â 71 (2)âIf the registered agent is changed, the written 72 acceptance of the successor registered agent described in s. 73 605.0113(2) must also be included in or attached to the 74 statement of change. 75 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 76 made by this act to section 605.0113, Florida Statutes, in 77 references thereto, paragraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (1) of 78 section 605.0203, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 79 605.0203âSigning of records to be delivered for filing to 80 department.â 81 (1)âA record delivered to the department for filing 82 pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows: 83 (b)âA companyâs initial articles of organization must be 84 signed by at least one person acting as an authorized 85 representative. The articles of organization must also include 86 or have attached a statement signed by the companyâs initial 87 registered agent in the form described in s. 605.0113(2). 88 (e)âA record changing the registered agent must also 89 include or be accompanied by a statement signed by the successor 90 registered agent in the form described in s. 605.0113(2). 91 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 92 made by this act to section 607.0501, Florida Statutes, in a 93 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 607.0202, Florida 94 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 95 607.0202âArticles of incorporation; content.â 96 (1)âThe articles of incorporation must set forth: 97 (a)âA corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the 98 requirements of s. 607.0401; 99 (b)âThe street address of the initial principal office and, 100 if different, the mailing address of the corporation; 101 (c)âThe number of shares the corporation is authorized to 102 issue; 103 (d)âThe street address of the corporationâs initial 104 registered office and the name of its initial registered agent 105 at that office together with a written acceptance as required in 106 s. 607.0501(3); and 107 (e)âThe name and address of each incorporator. 108 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 109 made by this act to section 607.0501, Florida Statutes, in a 110 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 607.0502, Florida 111 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 112 607.0502âChange of registered office or registered agent.â 113 (2)âIf the registered agent is changed, the written 114 acceptance of the successor registered agent described in s. 115 607.0501(3) must also be included in or attached to the 116 statement of change. 117 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.